Utah statutes.
19-9-116.   Obligations as authorized investments and securities.

Obligations issued pursuant to this chapter are securities in which all persons and organizations authorized to invest in obligations of this state may properly and legally invest.  These obligations are also declared to be securities which may properly and legally be deposited with, and received by, any state, county, or municipal officer.

